Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
CHAPTER 7 Prohibited Lobbying Practices

Cross references.

Bribery, §

16-10-2

.

Ethics in Government Act, §

21-5-1

et seq.

Regulation of lobbying, §

21-5-70

et seq.

Ethics and Efficiency in Government Act, T. 28, C. 11.

Law reviews.

For article, “Lobbying in the Shadows:
Religious Interest Groups in the Legislative Process,” see 64 Emory L.J. 1041 (2015).

28-7-1 and 28-7-2.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 29, §§ 1, 2; Code 1882, §§ 4486a, 4486b; Penal Code 1895, §§ 319, 320; Penal Code 1910, §§ 324, 325; Ga. L. 1911, p. 151, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 47-1001, 47-1002; Ga. L. 1970, p. 695, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8 (Code Enactment Act); Ga. L. 1991, p. 1687, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 28; repealed by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 18, effective April 6, 1992.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 18 repealed and reserved these Code sections, effective April 6, 1992. For present provisions, see Code Section 21-5-70 et seq.

28-7-3.
Contingent compensation for lobbyists.

No person, firm, corporation, or association shall retain or employ an attorney at law or an agent to aid or oppose legislation for compensation contingent, in whole or in part, upon the passage or defeat of any legislative measure.
No attorney at law or agent shall be employed to aid or oppose legislation for compensation contingent, in whole or in part, upon the passage or defeat of any legislation.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 151, § 2; Code 1933, § 47-1003; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 18.

28-7-4.
Presence of certain persons on floor of House or Senate for purpose of privately discussing pending measures.

It shall be unlawful for any person registered pursuant to the requirements of Article 4 of Chapter 5 of Title 21 or for any other person, except as authorized by the rules of the House or Senate, to be on the floor of either house of the General Assembly while the same is in session to discuss privately measures then pending in the General Assembly.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 151, § 4; Code 1933, § 47-1004; Ga. L. 1970, p. 695, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 18.

Law reviews.

For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 247 (1992).

28-7-5.
Penalty for violation of Code Section 28-7-3 or 28-7-4.

Any person failing to comply with or violating any of the provisions of Code Section 28-7-3 or 28-7-4 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 151, § 5; Code 1933, § 47-1005; Ga. L. 1970, p. 695, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 18.

Law reviews.

For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 247 (1992).